Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4709.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to require certain providers of electric service to establish and recover costs for renewable energy and clean energy programs; to require certain providers of electric or natural gas service to establish, and recover costs for, energy waste reduction programs; to ensure that any energy cost savings from renewable energy, clean energy, and energy waste reduction programs are ultimately returned to customers; to authorize the use of certain energy systems to meet the requirements of those programs; to regulate the location of certain energy systems; to provide for the approval of energy waste reduction service companies; to reduce energy waste by state agencies and the public; to create a wind energy resource zone board and provide for its power and duties; to authorize the creation and implementation of wind energy resource zones; to provide for expedited transmission line siting certificates; to provide for customer generation and net metering programs and the responsibilities of certain providers of electric service and customers with respect to customer generation and net metering; to provide for fees; to prescribe the powers and duties of certain state agencies and officials; to require the promulgation of rules and the issuance of orders; to authorize the establishment of residential energy improvement programs by providers of electric or natural gas service; to authorize certification by this state before the construction of certain wind and solar energy facilities and energy storage facilities; to regulate certain local ordinances; and to provide for civil sanctions, remedies, and penalties. Sec. 55. (1) A person shall not do either of the following: (a) Construct a wind turbine for the commercial production of electricity in the Great Lakes or their connecting waters. (b) Operate a wind turbine constructed in violation of subdivision (a). (2) Renewable energy credits shall not be granted for electricity generated by a wind turbine constructed in violation of subsection (1)(a). (3) The attorney general may bring an action for injunctive relief for a violation of this section.